Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 8. DEATH AND DISPOSITION OF THE BODY

SUBTITLE B. DISPOSITION OF THE BODY

CHAPTER 695. IN-CASKET IDENTIFICATION

Sec. 695.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Casket" means a container used to hold the remains of a deceased person.

(2) "Commission" means the Texas Funeral Service Commission.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 263 (H.B. 1468), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1280 (H.B. 1831), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 695.002. IDENTIFICATION OF DECEASED PERSON. The commission shall ensure a casket contains identification of the deceased person, including the person's name, date of birth, and date of death.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 263 (H.B. 1468), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1280 (H.B. 1831), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 695.003. RULES. The commission may adopt rules to enforce this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 263 (H.B. 1468), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1280 (H.B. 1831), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2009.